02_Morphology/french.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! nom, Noun
%<pl%>               ! pluriel, Plural
%>                   ! limite de morphème, Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON MPLURAL

%<pl%>:%>s ;

LEXICON FPLURAL

%<pl%>:%>s ;

LEXICON MN

%<n%>: MPLURAL ;

LEXICON FN ;

%<n%>: FPLURAL ;

LEXICON Nouns

étudiant:étudiant MN ;      ! "student " 
chat:caht MN ;              ! "cat"
chien:chien MN ;	    ! "dog"
café:café MN ;              ! "coffee"
glaçon:glaçon MN ;          ! "ice"
thé:thé MN ;	            ! "tea"
père:père MN ;	            ! "father"
mari:mari MN ;	            ! "husband"
poisson:poisson MN ;	    ! "fish"
ordinateur:ordinateur MN ;  ! "computer"

année:année FN ;	    ! "year"
seconde:seconde FN ;	    ! "second"
heure:heure FN ;	    ! "hour"
minute:minute FN ;          ! "minute"
bière:bière FN ;	    ! "beer"
mère:mère FN ;              ! "mother"
épouse:épouse FN ;	    ! "wife"
fille:fille FN ;	    ! "daughter"
cuisine:cuisine FN ;        ! "kitchen"
toilettes:toilettes FN ;    ! "bathroom"
